Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.060

Submission of charter—Publication.

The board of freeholders shall convene within ten days after their election and frame a charter for the city and within thirty days thereafter, they, or a majority of them, shall submit the charter to the legislative authority of the city, which, within five days thereafter, shall cause it to be published in the newspaper having the largest general circulation within the city at least once each week for four weeks next preceding the day of submitting the same to the electors for their approval.

[ 1985 c 469 s 22; 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.060. Prior: 1890 p 216 s 3, part; RRS s 8953, part.]

NOTES:

Submission of proposed charter, publication: State Constitution Art. 11 s 10 (Amendment 40).